North Dakota, session 69, HB1045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Two new subsections to section 43-30-16 of the North Dakota Century Code are
created and enacted as follows:
The application fee for a non-live remote or online classroom instruction course for apprentice
security officers may not exceed sixty dollars.
The fee for the renewal of all nonlicensed officers and owners of at least a ten percent interest
in a private security or detective agency may not exceed sixty dollars. A late fee not to exceed
twenty dollars may be charged for each month the renewal fee is due and unpaid.

H. B. NO. 1045 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1045.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 0 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State